th: บ้านและสวน > สนามและสวน > อุปกรณ์ไฟฟ้าสำหรับใช้งานกลางแจ้ง > อุปกรณ์เครื่องตัดหญ้า: แปรงยึดติดสำหรับเครื่องตัดหญ้า; ถุงเครื่องตัดหญ้า; สายพานเครื่องตัดหญ้า; ใบมีดเครื่องตัดหญ้า; ที่คลุมเครื่องตัดหญ้า; ชุดอุปกรณ์ต่อพ่วงสำหรับเครื่องตัดหญ้า; ชุดปรับแนวหญ้าสำหรับเครื่องตัดหญ้า; แผ่นปรับแนวหญ้าของเครื่องตัดหญ้า; สายพานและลูกรอกเครื่องตัดหญ้า; เบาะนั่งเครื่องตัดหญ้า; จุ๊บลมยางเครื่องตัดหญ้า; ยางล้อเครื่องตัดหญ้า; ล้อเครื่องตัดหญ้า; ชุดท้ายเครื่องตัดหญ้า; เครื่องกวาดเก็บหญ้า
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 草皮和花園 > 園藝機械器具配件 > 割草機配件: 割草機附件; 割草機集草袋; 割草機皮帶; 草坪割草機刀片; 草坪割草機保護罩; 割草機拖掛套件; 割草機覆蓋物套組; 割草機覆蓋塞/覆蓋板; 割草機皮帶輪; 割草機座椅; 割草機輪胎內胎; 割草機輪胎; 割草機輪; 精割草皮套組; 拖式草地清潔機
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Veja ir sodas > Lauko motorinės įrangos priedai > Vejapjovių priedai: Krūmapjovių priedai; Vejapjovių krepšiai; Vejapjovių diržai; Vejapjovių peiliai; Vejapjovių gaubtai; Vejapjovių tvirtinimo rinkiniai; Vejapjovių mulčiavimo rinkiniai; Vejapjovių mulčiavimo kaiščiai ir plokštės; Vejapjovių skriemuliai ir tuščiosios eigos skriemuliai; Vejapjovių sėdynės; Vejapjovių padangų kameros; Vejapjovių padangos; Vejapjovių ratai; Vejos pjovimo juostomis rinkiniai; Vejos šlavimo mašinos
nl: Huis en tuin > Tuin en gazon > Accessoires voor elektrische apparatuur voor buitengebruik > Accessoires voor grasmaaiers: Hulpstukken voor borstelmaaiers; Grasmaaierzakken; Aandrijfriemen voor grasmaaiers; Grasmaaierbladen; Grasmaaierhoezen; Aankoppelsets voor grasmaaiers; Mulchsets voor grasmaaiers; Mulchplugs en -platen voor grasmaaiers; Riemschijven en tussenwielen voor grasmaaiers; Grasmaaierstoelen; Binnenbanden voor grasmaaiers; Grasmaaierbanden; Grasmaaierwielen; Sets voor het maaien van gazonstrepen; Gazonvegers
sv: Hem och trädgård > Gräsmatta och trädgård > Tillbehör till utomhusmaskiner > Tillbehör till gräsklippare: Tillsatser för buskklippning; Gräsklipparpåsar; Gräsklipparremmar; Gräsklipparknivar; Gräsklipparskydd; Kopplingssatser för gräsklippare; Komposteringssats; Kontakter och plattor för kompostering; Remskivor och drev till gräsklippare; Gräsklipparsäten; Slangar till gräsklippare; Gräsklippardäck; Gräsklipparhjul; Sats för randig gräsmatta; Lövsamlare
de: Heim & Garten > Rasen & Garten > Zubehör für Gartenmaschinen > Rasenmäher-Zubehör: Wiesenmäher-Zusatzteile; Grasauffangbehälter; Rasenmäher-Keilriemen; Rasenmähermesser; Rasenmäherabdeckungen; Anhängerkupplungssätze für Rasenmäher; Mulchkits für Rasenmäher; Mulchstopfen & Bleche für Rasenmäher; Rasenmäher-Riemenscheiben & -Zwischenräder; Rasenmähersitze; Rasenmäher-Reifenschläuche; Rasenmäher-Reifen; Rasenmäher-Räder; Rasenmäher-Antriebsrollen; Rasenkehrmaschinen
fr: Maison et jardin > Pelouses et jardins > Accessoires pour équipement électrique d’extérieur > Accessoires pour tondeuses à gazon: Accessoires pour tondeuses débroussailleuses; Sacs pour tondeuses à gazon; Courroies pour tondeuses à gazon; Lames de tondeuse à gazon; Housses pour tondeuses à gazon; Kits d’attelage pour tondeuse à gazon; Kits de paillage pour tondeuses à gazon; Bouchons et plaques de paillis pour tondeuses à gazon; Poulies et galets pour tondeuses à gazon; Sièges pour tondeuses à gazon; Chambres à air pour tondeuses à gazon; Pneus de tondeuse à gazon; Roues de tondeuse à gazon; Kits pour motifs sur gazon; Balais ramasseurs
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Travnik in vrt > Dodatki za zunanjo električno opremo > Dodatki za kosilnice: Priključki za kosilnice; Košare za kosilnice; Jermeni za kosilnice; Rezila za kosilnice; Pokrovi za kosilnice; Kompleti za priklop kosilnice; Kompleti za mulčenje za kosilnice; Čepi in plošče za mulčenje za kosilnice; Škripci in vodila za kosilnice; Sedeži za kosilnice; Zračnice za kosilnice; Pnevmatike za kosilnice; Kolesa za kosilnice; Kompleti valjev za košenje; Pometalci trave
hu: Otthon és kert > Gyep és kert > Kültéri elektromos berendezés kiegészítők > Fűnyíró-kiegészítők: Bokornyíró-kiegészítők; Fűnyíró táskák; Fűnyíró hevederek; Fűnyíró pengék; Fűnyíró burkolatok; Fűnyíró vonókészletek; Fűnyíró mulcskészletek; Fűnyíró mulcsdugók és -lemezek; Fűnyíró csigák és üresjáratok; Fűnyíró-ülések; Fűnyíró gumicsövek; Fűnyíró gumik; Fűnyíró kerekek; Gyepcsíkozó készletek; Gyepseprők
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Relva e jardim > Acessórios de equipamento elétrico de exterior > Acessórios para corta-relvas: Fixações para roçadeiras; Sacos para corta-relva; Cintas para corta-relva; Lâminas para corta-relva; Coberturas para corta-relva; Kits de engate para cortadores de relva; Kits de matéria orgânica para corta-relva; Conexões e placas de corta-relva para matéria orgânica; Polias e engrenagens para corta-relva; Assentos para cortadores de relva; Câmaras-de-ar para corta-relva; Pneus para corta-relva; Rodas para corta-relva; Kits de corta-relva para riscas; Varredores de relva
en: Home & Garden > Lawn & Garden > Outdoor Power Equipment Accessories > Lawn Mower Accessories: Brush Mower Attachments; Lawn Mower Bags; Lawn Mower Belts; Lawn Mower Blades; Lawn Mower Covers; Lawn Mower Hitch Kits; Lawn Mower Mulch Kits; Lawn Mower Mulch Plugs & Plates; Lawn Mower Pulleys & Idlers; Lawn Mower Seats; Lawn Mower Tire Tubes; Lawn Mower Tires; Lawn Mower Wheels; Lawn Striping Kits; Lawn Sweepers
it: Casa e giardino > Prato e giardino > Accessori attrezzatura motorizzata per esterni > Accessori tagliaerba: Prolunghe per tosaerba; Sacchetti tagliaerba; Cinghie tagliaerba; Lame tagliaerba; Coperture tagliaerba; Kit di traino per tagliaerba; Kit di pacciame per tagliaerba; Prese e piastre in pacciame per tagliaerba; Pulegge e ruote di rinvio tagliaerba; Sedili per tagliaerba; Camere d'aria per pneumatici di tagliaerba; Pneumatici per tagliaerba; Ruote per tagliaerba; Kit per decorazione prati; Spazzole per erba
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Gramado e jardim > Acessórios para equipamento elétrico de exteriores de residências > Acessórios para cortador de grama: Peças para cortadores de grama de escova; Sacos para cortador de grama; Cintos para cortador de grama; Lâminas para cortador de grama; Tampas para cortadores de grama; Kits de engate para cortadores de grama; Kits de cobertura orgânica do solo para cortadores de grama; Plugues e placas de cobertura orgânica do solo para cortadores de grama; Roldanas e polias para cortadores de grama; Assentos para cortadores de grama; Câmaras de ar para pneus de cortador de grama; Pneus para cortadores de grama; Rodas para cortadores de grama; Kits para fazer listras com cortadores de grama; Varredores de jardim
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Piha ja puutarha > Ulkokäyttöisten voimatyökalujen lisätarvikkeet > Ruohonleikkurin lisätarvikkeet: Ruohonleikkurin harjalaitteet; Ruohonkeräyspussit; Ruohonleikkurin hihnat; Ruohonleikkurin terät; Ruohonleikkurin suojapeitteet; Ruohonleikkurin vetokoukkusarjat; Ruohonleikkurin heinäkonesetit; Ruohonleikkurin heinänleikkuureunat ja -levyt; Ruohonleikkurin vedettävät ja työnnettävät lisälaitteet; Ruohonleikkurin istuimet; Ruohonleikkurin sisäkumit; Ruohonleikkurin renkaat; Ruohonleikkurin pyörät; Nurmikon raidoitussetit; Lehtien- ja ruohonkerääjät
pl: Dom i ogród > Trawnik i ogród > Akcesoria do elektronarzędzi ogrodowych > Akcesoria do kosiarek: Końcówki do przycinania krzewów; Kosze na skoszoną trawę; Paski do kosiarek; Noże do kosiarek; Osłony do kosiarek; Zestawy zaczepów do kosiarek; Zestawy mulczujące do kosiarek; Dodatki mulczujące do kosiarek; Koła pasowe i zębate do kosiarek; Siedziska do kosiarek; Dętki do opon do kosiarek; Opony do kosiarek; Koła do kosiarek; Zestawy do robienia wzorów na trawie; Zamiataczki trawnikowe
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Gazon și grădină > Accesorii pentru echipamente electrice pentru lucru în aer liber > Accesorii pentru mașini de tuns iarba: Accesorii mașini de tuns arbuști; Saci pentru mașini de tuns iarba; Curele pentru mașini de tuns iarba; Lame pentru mașini de tuns iarba; Huse pentru mașini de tuns iarba; Kituri de cuplare pentru mașină de tuns iarbă; Seturi mulci pentru mașini de tuns iarba; Dopuri și plăci pentru mașini de tuns iarba; Scripeți și role de ghidare pentru mașini de tuns iarba; Scaune pentru mașini de tuns iarbă; Tuburi pentru cauciucuri pentru mașini de tuns iarba; Cauciucuri pentru mașini de tuns iarba; Roți pentru mașini de tuns iarba; Seturi pentru dungi gazon; Mături gazon
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > ガーデン用品・ガーデン機器 > ガーデン機器関連用品 > 芝刈り機関連用品: 刈払機用アタッチメント; 芝刈り機用グラスバッグ; 芝刈り機用ベルト; 芝刈り機用替刃; 芝刈り機用カバー; 芝刈り機用ヒッチキット; 芝刈り機マルチング キット; 芝刈り機マルチング プラグ; 芝刈機用滑車; 芝刈り機用シート; 芝刈り機用タイヤチューブ; 芝刈り機用タイヤ; 芝刈り機用ホイール; 芝生ストライピング キット; 芝生用スイーパー
cs: Dům a zahrada > Trávníky a zahrady > Motorová zahradní technika – příslušenství > Sekačky – příslušenství: Nástavce ke kartáčové sekačce; Sběrné koše k zahradním sekačkám; Pásy pro zahradní sekačky; Čepele k zahradním sekačkám; Kryty k zahradním sekačkám; Sady tažného zařízení pro sekačky; Mulčovací sady pro sekačky; Mulčovací záslepky pro sekačky; Řemenice a kladky k zahradním sekačkám; Sedátka pro sekačky; Duše do pneumatik zahradních sekaček; Pneumatiky na zahradní sekačky; Kola pro zahradní sekačky; Travní válce k sekačkám; Zahradní zametače
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Çim ve Bahçe > Elektrikli Bahçe Ekipman Aksesuarları > Çim Biçme Makinesi Aksesuarları: Çalı Biçme Makinesi Parçaları; Çim Biçme Makinesi Çuvalları; Çim Biçme Makinesi Kayışları; Çim Biçme Makinesi Bıçakları; Çim Biçme Makinesi Kılıfları; Çim Biçme Makinesi Çeki Demiri Kitleri; Çim Biçme Makinesi Malçlama Malzemeleri; Çim Biçme Makinesi Malçlama Tapaları ve Levhaları; Çim Biçme Makinesi Makaraları ve Kasnakları; Çim Biçme Makinesi Koltukları; Çim Biçme Makinesi İç Lastikleri; Çim Biçme Makinesi Lastikleri; Çim Biçme Makinesi Tekerlekleri; Çim Düzeltme Makinesi Aletleri; Çim Temizleme Makineleri
vi: Nhà và vườn > Bãi cỏ và vườn > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện ngoài trời > Phụ kiện máy cắt cỏ: Dụng cụ gắn chổi quét; Túi đựng cỏ của máy cắt cỏ; Dây curoa máy cắt cỏ; Lưỡi máy cắt cỏ; Nắp máy cắt cỏ; Bộ sản phẩm móc kéo máy cắt cỏ; Bộ phủ bổi của máy cắt cỏ; Nút chặn và đĩa phủ bổi của máy cắt cỏ; Pu-li và pu-li đệm máy cắt cỏ; Ghế máy cắt cỏ; Lốp máy xén cỏ; Lốp xe máy xén cỏ; Bánh xe máy xén cỏ; Bộ kẻ vạch trên cỏ; Máy quét cỏ
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 잔디/정원 > 야외용 동력 설비 부대용품 > 잔디깎이 부대용품: 브러시 잔디깎이 부속품; 잔디깎이용 잔디 자루; 잔디깎이 벨트; 잔디깎이 날; 잔디깎이 커버; 잔디 깎기 기계 히치 키트; 잔디깎이 멀칭 키트; 잔디깎이 멀칭 플러그/플레이트; 잔디깎이 도르래/아이들러; 잔디 깎기 기계 좌석; 잔디깎이 타이어 튜브; 잔디깎이 타이어; 잔디깎이 바퀴; 잔디깎이 무늬 키트; 잔디 청소기
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Trávnik a záhrada > Príslušenstvo pre vonkajšie elektrické zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre kosačky: Nadstavce na kosačku; Zberné koše pre kosačky; Hnacie remene pre kosačky; Čepele pre kosačky; Obaly pre kosačky; Sady ťažného zariadenia pre kosačky; Mulčovacie súpravy pre kosačky; Mulčovacie zátky a platne pre kosačky; Kladky a voľnobeh pre kosačky; Sedadlá pre kosačky; Duše pneumatík pre kosačky; Pneumatiky pre kosačky; Kolesá pre kosačky; Súpravy na pruhovanie trávnika; Zametače trávnika
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Travnjak i vrt > Pribor za vanjsku električnu opremu > Pribor za kosilice: Nastavci za grmove; Vreće za kosilice; Remenje za kosilice; Oštrice za kosilice; Navlake za kosilice; Komplet za kuke za kosilice; Kompleti malča za kosilice; Čepovi i ploče za malčiranje za kosilice; Koloturi i zupčanici praznog hoda za kosilice; Sjedala za kosilice; Zračnice guma za kosilice; Gume za kosilice; Kotači za kosilice; Kompleti za pruganje travnjaka; Čistači travnjaka
ru: Дом и сад > Товары для придомовых и садовых участков > Аксессуары для садовой техники > Аксессуары для газонокосилок: Комплектующие для роторных газонокосилок; Травосборники для газонокосилок; Ремни для газонокосилок; Ножи для газонокосилок; Чехлы для газонокосилок; Комплекты прицепов для газонокосилок; Насадки для мульчирования для газонокосилок; Заглушки и ножи для мульчирования для газонокосилок; Шкивы и натяжные ролики для газонокосилок; Сиденья для газонокосилок; Камеры для шин для газонокосилок; Шины для газонокосилок; Колеса для газонокосилок; Насадки для разметки газона; Подметальные щетки для газона
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Морава и градина > Аксесоари за електрическо оборудване за външна употреба > Аксесоари за косачки за трева: Приставки за четка за косачки; Торби за косачки; Ремъци за косачки; Остриета за косачки; Покривала за косачки; Комплекти за тегличи за косачки; Комплекти за мулчиране за косачки; Щепсели и ножове за мулчиране за косачки; Шайби и обтяжни ролки за косачки; Седалки за косачки; Вътрешни гуми за косачки; Гуми за косачки; Колела за косачки; Комплекти за очертаване на тревни ивици; Машини за почистване на трева
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 草坪与花园 > 户外电力设备配件 > 割草机配件: 草坪修剪机附件; 割草机袋; 割草机带; 割草机刀片; 割草机盖; 割草机牵引套件; 割草机护盖物套装; 割草机护盖物插头与板; 割草机涨紧轮/惰轮; 割草机座椅; 割草机轮胎内胎; 割草机轮胎; 割草机轮子; 草坪划线套装; 草坪清扫机/工具
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Γκαζόν & κήπος > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρικού εξοπλισμού εξωτερικού χώρου > Αξεσουάρ χλοοκοπτικών: Εξαρτήματα κοπτικών θάμνων; Τσάντες χορτοκοπτικών; Τσάντες χλοοκοπτικών; Λεπίδες χλοοκοπτικών; Καλύμματα χλοοκοπτικών; Κιτ κοτσαδόρου χλοοκοπτικού; Κιτ χλοοκοπτικής επίστρωσης; Πώματα & πλάκες πολτοποίησης χλοοκοπτικών; Τροχαλίες & ελεύθερες τροχαλίες χλοοκοπτικών; Καθίσματα χλοοκοπτικού; Σωλήνες ελαστικών χλοοκοπτικών; Ελαστικά χλοοκοπτικών; Τροχοί χλοοκοπτικών; Σετ λωρίδων χλοοκοπτικών; Σκούπες χλοοτάπητα
da: Hjem og have > Græsplæne og have > Elektriske haveredskaber – tilbehør > Plæneklippere – tilbehør: Buskrydder – ekstraudstyr; Plæneklipper – tasker; Plæneklipper – bælter; Plæneklipper – knivblade; Overtræk til plæneklippere; Koblingssæt til plæneklippere; Plæneklipper – formuldingssæt; Plæneklipper – formuldingsindsatser og -plader; Plæneklipper – remskiver og mellemhjul; Sæder til plæneklippere; Slanger til plæneklipperdæk; Plæneklipper – dæk; Plæneklipper – hjul; Græsmønstersystemer; Plæneopsamlere
nb: Hjem og hage > Plen og hage > Tilbehør til utendørs elektrisk utstyr > Tilbehør til gressklippere: Tilbehør til slåmaskiner; Gressklipperposer; Gressklipperbelter; Gressklipperblader; Gressklippertrekk; Festesett for gressklippere; Tekningssett for gressklippere; Tekningsplugger og -plater for gressklippere; Drev og skiver til gressklippere; Gressklipperseter; Dekkslanger til gressklippere; Dekk til gressklippere; Hjul til gressklippere; Gresstripesett; Gressfeiere
es: Casa y jardín > Jardín > Accesorios para maquinaria de jardinería > Accesorios de cortadoras de césped: Accesorios para segadoras de peine; Bolsas para cortadoras de césped; Correas de cortadoras de césped; Cuchillas de cortadoras de césped; Fundas para cortadoras de césped; Kits de enganche para cortacésped; Kits de mulch para cortacésped; Tapas y placas de mulch para cortacésped; Poleas de cortadoras de césped; Asientos para cortacésped; Cámaras de aire para neumáticos de cortacéspedes; Neumáticos de cortadoras de césped; Ruedas de cortadoras de césped; Kits de rayado de césped; Barredoras de césped